Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 5. Relationship to other Programs.

Sec. 43.23.240.
Eligibility for public assistance.

In determining the eligibility of an individual under a public assistance program administered by the Department of Health and Social Services in which eligibility for assistance is based on financial need, the Department of Health and Social Services may not consider a permanent fund dividend as income or resources received by the recipient of public assistance or by a member of the recipient’s household unless required to do so by federal law or regulation. The Department of Health and Social Services shall notify all recipients of public assistance of the effects of receiving a permanent fund dividend.

An individual who is denied medical assistance under 42 U.S.C. 1396 — 1396p (Social Security Act, Title XIX) solely because of the receipt of a permanent fund dividend by the individual or by a member of the individual’s household is eligible for state-funded medical assistance under AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

(general relief assistance program). The individual is entitled to receive, for a period not to exceed four months, the same level of medical assistance as the individual would have received under 42 U.S.C. 1396 — 1396p (Social Security Act, Title XIX) had there been no permanent fund dividend program.

An individual who is denied assistance solely because permanent fund dividends received by the individual or by a member of the individual’s household are counted as income or resources under federal law or regulation is eligible for cash assistance under AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

(general relief assistance program). Notwithstanding the limit in AS

47.25.130

, the individual is entitled to receive, for a period not to exceed four months, the same amount as the individual would have received under other public assistance programs had there been no permanent fund dividend program.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

43.23.075

; renumbered in 2018.

Cross references. —

For a temporary provision relating to the permanent fund dividend and eligibility for public assistance and medical assistance during the novel coronavirus disease (COVID-19) public health disaster emergency declared on March 11, 2020 or until November 15, 2020, whichever first occurs, see § 22, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For permanent fund dividend distribution, see 7 AAC 38.

Sec. 43.23.250.
Eligibility for state programs.

A program administered by the state or any of its instrumentalities or municipalities, the eligibility for which is based on financial need, may not consider a permanent fund dividend as income or resources unless required to do so by federal law or regulation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

43.23.085

; renumbered in 2018.

Cross references. —

For a temporary provision relating to eligibility for a state program based on financial need during the novel coronavirus disease (COVID-19) public health disaster emergency or until November 15, 2020, whichever first occurs, see § 22(d), ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For permanent fund dividend distribution, see 7 AAC 38.